Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 5. Industrial Health Service

§ 35-1-501.
Short title.

This act [§§

35-1-501

through

35-1-503

] shall be cited as the Industrial Health Service Act of 1945.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 149, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 63-701; W.S. 1957, § 35-80.

§ 35-1-502.
Service of industrial hygiene created.

The state department of health is hereby authorized and empowered to create and maintain a service of industrial hygiene as the state health officer may deem necessary.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 149, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 63-702; W.S. 1957, § 35-81; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-1-503.
Investigations; annual report required.

The industrial hygiene service shall investigate places of employment and study those conditions which might be responsible for ill health of the industrial workers and submit a yearly report to the state treasurer.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 149, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 63-703; W.S. 1957, § 35-82.

Cross references. —

As to collection of industrial statistics generally, see §

27-2-105

.